North Carolina, session 2025, SB677.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. USE OF STATE-OWNED PROPERTY FOR CHILDCARE CENTERS FOR
STATE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Administration shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Joint Legislative
Commission on Governmental Operations, no later than March 31, 2026, on the feasibility and
advisability of using obsolete or underutilized state-owned buildings (available buildings) to
house childcare facilities giving childcare priority to State employees. The report shall include
the following:
(1) Location of each available building.
(2) Estimated costs for upfitting each property to meet daycare licensing
standards.
(3) Estimated costs for asbestos and lead remediation.
(4) Barriers to the available buildings' use as a childcare facility.
SECTION 1.(b) Any project undertaken by the State to build or renovate property
having a budget greater than five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall include a child care center or
adult day care center if more than 250 people would work in the building. This requirement
includes current projects which have not broken ground by July 1, 2025, unless one or both of
the following exceptions apply:
(1) Inclusion of either type of center would delay the project by six months or
more.
(2) Inclusion of either type of center would increase the project cost by 10% or
more.
*S677-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

PART II. CHILDCARE FOR STATE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 2.(a) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall
establish a pilot program for onsite childcare for State employees as follows:
(1) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall contract with
a private commercial childcare provider to establish three childcare centers
for State employees use to be established on State-owned property that is
unused or underutilized.
(2) Priority in contracting shall be given to commercial childcare providers who
currently operate five or fewer facilities and provide high quality childcare.
(3) The Division of Child Development and Early Education must include the
following terms in the contract with the commercial childcare providers:
a. The childcare facility must operate an apprenticeship program in
conjunction with a public or private university or community college
who operates an early childcare education program.
b. The childcare center must comply with the requirements established
by the Division of Child Development and Early Education for
apprenticeship program.
c. The childcare center must maintain the operation of the apprenticeship
program for so long as the childcare center is housed in state-owned
property and the university or community college is willing to
continue the partnership.
d. The State will provide the upfit cost of the space to meet the licensure
requirements at reasonable levels that are customary at the operators'
other facilities and those similarly situated and provide use of the space
rent free, notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 146-29.1.
e. The lease terms for state-owned property must be approved as required
by G.S. 146-27.
SECTION 2.(b) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall
create the requirements for the apprenticeship program and pair the childcare centers with a
university or community college early education program utilizing parameters similar to the
Durham Childcare Apprenticeship Program.
SECTION 2.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Resources the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the 2025-2026
fiscal year for the Division of Child Development and Early Education's use in establishing the
childcare centers as required by Section 2(a) of this act.
SECTION 2.(d) If any expenses are incurred by the State for asbestos or lead
remediation in establishing the childcare centers required by Section 2(a) of this act, the State
shall be eligible for reimbursement from the Asbestos and Lead Remediation Fund subject to the
rules of the fund for up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
SECTION 2.(e) By April 1, 2027, the Division of Child Development and Early
Education shall report on and make recommendations to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
General Government, and the Fiscal Research Division the status of the implementation of the
pilot program including successes, concerns, problems encountered, enrollment, and
expenditures.
SECTION 2.(f) Sections 2(c) and 2(d) of this act are effective July 1, 2025.

PART III. ONSITE CHILDCARE FOR THIRD-SHIFT FIRST RESPONDERS
SECTION 3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services the sum of six million dollars ($6,000,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal
Page 2 Senate Bill 677-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
year for a pilot program to provide counties grants to establish third-shift childcare for first
responders, with priority to be given to third shift facilities operated in unused or underutilized
county-owned buildings. By April 1, 2027, the Department of Health and Human Services shall
report on and make recommendations to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health
and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government, and
the Fiscal Research Division regarding the implementation of the pilot program including
successes, concerns, problems encountered, enrollment, and expenditures.
SECTION 3.(b) Section 3(a) of this act is effective July 1, 2025.

PART IV. ONSITE CHILDCARE AT EACH NORTH CAROLINA COMMUNITY
COLLEGE AND COLLEGE IN THE UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA SYSTEM
SECTION 4.1.(a) Report. – The State Board of Community Colleges shall study
and report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division of the
General Assembly, no later than March 31, 2026, on the feasibility and advisability of
implementing a publicly available child care program on every community college campus that
offers priority enrollment to the children of community college employees and students. The
report shall include the following:
(1) Recommendations for implementing the childcare program.
(2) Estimated costs for implementation and maintenance of the childcare
program.
(3) Return on investment of the childcare program.
(4) Issues related to historical and ongoing utilization of grants or other funding.
(5) Barriers to implementation of the childcare program.
SECTION 4.1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
College System Office the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the study required
by Section 4.1(a) of this act.
SECTION 4.1.(c) Section 4.1(b) of this act is effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4.2.(a) The Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina shall
study and report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division of the
General Assembly, no later than March 31, 2026, on the feasibility and advisability of
implementing a publicly available childcare program at each constituent institution campus that
offers priority enrollment to the children of university employees and students. The report shall
include:
(1) Recommendations for implementing the childcare program.
(2) Estimated costs for implementation and maintenance of the childcare
program.
(3) Return on investment of the childcare program.
(4) Issues related to historical and ongoing utilization of grants or other funding.
(5) Barriers to implementation of the childcare program.
SECTION 4.2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the study required by Section
4.2(a) of this act.
SECTION 4.2.(c) Section 4.2(b) of this act is effective July 1, 2025.

PART V. ESTABLISH WORKGROUP TO EXAMINE STREAMLINING LICENSURE
REQUIREMENTS FOR PHYSICAL STRUCTURE OF COMMERCIAL CHILDCARE
FACILITIES
SECTION 5.(a) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall
establish the Commercial Childcare Licensure Workgroup to examine streamlining requirements
Senate Bill 677-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
related to the physical structure of commercial childcare centers. The workgroup shall consist of
one representative from each of the following to be chosen by the North Carolina Child Care
Commission:
(1) The Division of Child Development and Early Education.
(2) The Office of the State Fire Marshal.
(3) The Department of Insurance.
(4) The North Carolina Building Code Council.
(5) The Division of Public Health.
(6) The League of Municipalities.
(7) The North Carolina Association of County Commissioners.
The North Carolina Child Care Commission shall also appoint two commissioners to
the workgroup who shall also serve as co-chairs of the workgroup.
SECTION 5.(b) The workgroup shall develop findings and recommendations related
to at least the following:
(1) Streamlining the licensing requirements related to the physical facilities
related to commercial childcare facilities, including building codes, fire codes,
and sanitation codes.
(2) Developing statewide, uniform application of the commercial childcare
licensing requirements related to the physical facility including building
codes, fire codes, and sanitation codes and statewide, uniform inspections
related to those codes.
(3) Resolving conflicts between various code requirements for commercial
childcare licensing.
SECTION 5.(c) By January 1, 2026, the Division of Child Development and Early
Education shall report the findings and recommendations of the work group to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on General Government, and the Fiscal Research Division.

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 4 Senate Bill 677-First Edition